Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of gaming; problem gambling telehealth pilot program; annual report A. The sum of $2,000,000 is appropriated from the state lottery fund established by section 5-571, Arizona Revised Statutes, in each of fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 to the department of gaming for problem gambling telehealth pilot program.  This amount consists of monies remaining in the state lottery fund that would otherwise be deposited in the state general fund pursuant to section 5-572, subsection G, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The department of gaming shall use the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section to enter into a public-private partnership with a digital health organization to provide a mobile-based telehealth application prioritizing a vendor that offers a digital front door model, providing immediate, no-cost access to users without the requirement of traditional insurance billing at the point-of-service. The application shall provide the following services to residents of this state: 1. Self-guided clinical activities and behavioral tracking tools. 2. Real-time urge monitoring and peer-support community features. 3. Educational content developed by experts in gambling addiction. 4. Specific interfaces for the support networks and family members of those struggling with gambling addiction. 5. Integration capabilities with existing state-funded treatment assistance programs. C. On or before December 31, 2026 and each year thereafter through December 31, 2029, the department of gaming shall submit a report regarding the pilot program's efficacy, including the number of active users, engagement metrics and self-reported recovery outcomes to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.